California, session 20252026, AB1626.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35179.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:35179.1. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the 1998 California High School Coaching Education and Training Program.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The exploding demand in girls athletics, and an increase in the number of pupils participating in both boys and girls athletics, are causing an increase in the number of coaches needed statewide.(2) Well-trained coaches are vital to the success of the experience of a pupil in sports and interscholastic athletic activities.(3) Coaches are often trusted adults who maintain regular contact with youth and are well positioned to observe changes in behavior, mood, or functioning that may indicate a need for behavioral health support.(4) Improvement in coaching is a primary need identified by hundreds of principals, superintendents, and school board members who participated in the development of a strategic plan for the California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) in 1993 and 1994.(5) There are many concerns about safety, training, organization, philosophy, communications, and general management in coaching that need to be addressed.(6) It is a conservative estimate that at least 25,000 coaches annually need training and an orientation just to meet current coaching regulations contained in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, including basic safety and CPR requirements.(7) School districts, in conjunction with the California Interscholastic Federation, have taken the initial first steps toward building a statewide coaching education program by assembling a faculty of statewide trainers composed of school district administrators, coaches, and athletic directors using a national program being used in several states.(c) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to establish a California High School Coaching Education and Training Program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program be administered by school districts, be updated and rehearsed annually, and emphasize the following components:(1) Development of coaching philosophies consistent with school, school district, and governing board of a school district goals.(2) Sport psychology: emphasizing communication, reinforcement of the efforts of pupils, effective delivery of coaching regarding technique, and motivation of the pupil athlete.(3) Sport pedagogy: how pupil athletes learn, and how to teach sport skills.(4) Sport physiology: principles of training, fitness for sport, development of a training program, nutrition for athletes, and the harmful effects associated with the use of steroids and performance-enhancing dietary supplements by adolescents.(5) Sport management: team management, risk management, and working within the context of an entire school program.(6) Training: certification in CPR, use of an automated external defibrillator (AED), and first aid that includes, but is not limited to, training in recognizing the signs and symptoms of, and responding to, concussions, heat illness, and, by July 1, 2024, cardiac arrest. Certification in CPR and use of an AED shall be consistent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. Concussion, heat illness, and cardiac arrest training may be provided by entities offering free, online, or other types of training courses. For purposes of this section, “heat illness” includes heat cramps, heat syncope, heat exhaustion, and exertional heat stroke.(7) Knowledge of, and adherence to, statewide rules and regulations, as well as school regulations, including, but not necessarily limited to, eligibility, gender equity, and discrimination.(8) Sound planning and goal setting.(d) This section does not endorse a particular coaching education or training program.SEC. 2. Section 35179.85 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 35179.8, to read:35179.85. (a) The trainings described in Sections 33315.7 and 49032.1, as added by Assembly Bill 1665 of the 2025–26 Regular Session, shall cover, but are not limited to, all of the following topics:(1) Substantive awareness of behavioral and mental health challenges specific to pupil athletes, including, but not limited to, performance anxiety, injury-related behavioral and mental health impacts, and the pressures of competition and recruitment.(2) Trauma-informed care and recognizing signs and symptoms of common behavioral and mental health conditions in adolescents, including, but not limited to, suicide risk and prevention, crisis deescalation, mental distress, anxiety, depression, self-harm, substance use disorder, and eating disorders.(3)Awareness of behavioral and mental health challenges specific to pupil athletes, including, but not limited to, performance anxiety, injury-related behavioral and mental health impacts, and the pressures of competition and recruitment.(4)(3) Strategies for creating a positive team culture that promotes behavioral and mental well-being, reduces stigma around behavioral and mental health, and encourages help-seeking behavior among pupil athletes.(5)(4) Appropriate communication techniques for approaching and supporting pupil athletes who may be experiencing behavioral and mental health difficulties.(6)(5) Procedures for referring pupil athletes to appropriate mental health resources, including school counselors, psychologists, and community behavioral and mental health services.(7)(6) Understanding of the coach’s role and limitations in supporting pupil behavioral and mental health, including, but not limited to, ethical boundaries and the importance of professional behavioral and mental health care.(b) This section does not permit coaches to provide mental health counseling or therapy, or to substitute for the services of licensed behavioral and mental health professionals. The purpose of the training required pursuant to this section is to enhance coaches’ awareness and ability to recognize potential mental health concerns and connect pupil athletes with appropriate professional resources.(c) The training required pursuant to this section may be provided by entities offering free, online, or other types of training courses.SEC. 3. Section 35179.87 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 35179.85, to read:35179.87. (a) (1) On or before September 1, 2027, the department shall identify existing training or develop a model youth athletics behavioral and mental health training for persons who serve as coaches in youth sports organizations, both for recreational leagues and competitive or club leagues.(2) The training shall cover, but not be limited to, all of the following topics:(A) Strategies for creating a positive team culture that promotes healthy behavioral and mental well-being.(B) Protective factors that promote youth resilience, well-being, and positive mental health.(C) Awareness of behavioral and mental health challenges specific to youth athletes.(D) Recognition of signs and symptoms of common behavioral and mental health conditions in youth and adolescents.(E) Appropriate communication techniques for approaching and supporting youth athletes who may be experiencing behavioral and mental health difficulties.(F) Appropriate referral pathways, including how to connect youth and families to school-based behavioral health services, community-based organizations, crisis support, and emergency resources when necessary.(G) Understanding of the coach’s role and limitations in supporting youth athletes’ behavioral and mental health, including ethical boundaries and the importance of professional behavioral and mental health care.(b) The training content developed pursuant to subdivision (a) may be aligned with statewide youth mental health and school wellness initiatives.(c) The department shall post the training identified or developed pursuant to subdivision (a) on its internet website and work with local partners to disseminate the training to appropriate youth athletic leagues, youth coaching entities, and relevant statewide organizations and associations.